src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON ROM-ONE-TAG   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ; !
! +N: ROMNUMTAG ; ! !The Olav viđeš fix (Roman V now gets A)
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ; !

! Here, we split the Roman numerals, in order to account for cases like "Kapihtal II-IV".
! We may send this first part directly to ROM-TAG below (and get the +Num tag), or we may
! send them through a second loop, identical to the first one, but marked wit "2" (the lexica
! are called 2ROMAN, etc. We do this instead of making a loop, since we do not want cases
! like "II-IV-VI-VII-IX". If that should turn out to be a good idea, a loop would do the
! trick.

LEXICON ROM-SPLIT   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 +Use/Circ:%- 2ROMAN ; ! II-VI, etc. !


! Here goes loop 2.

LEXICON 2ROMAN   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-THOUSAND ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-HUNDRED ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE ; !

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 M+Use/Circ:M 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG; !
 MM+Use/Circ:MM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG; !
 MMM+Use/Circ:MMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG; !
 MMMM+Use/Circ:MMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG; !
 MMMMM+Use/Circ:MMMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG; !

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-HUNDRED ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN ;				 !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE ;				!

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 C+Use/Circ:C 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 CC+Use/Circ:CC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 CCC+Use/Circ:CCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 CD+Use/Circ:CD 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 D+Use/Circ:D 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 DC+Use/Circ:DC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 DCC+Use/Circ:DCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 DCCC+Use/Circ:DCCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 CM+Use/Circ:CM 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE ;				!
LEXICON 2ROM-TEN   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 X+Use/Circ:X 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 XX+Use/Circ:XX 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 XXX+Use/Circ:XXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 XL+Use/Circ:XL 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 L+Use/Circ:L 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 LX+Use/Circ:LX 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 LXX+Use/Circ:LXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 LXXX+Use/Circ:LXXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 XC+Use/Circ:XC 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE ; !

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 I+Use/Circ:I 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 II+Use/Circ:II 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 III+Use/Circ:III 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 IV+Use/Circ:IV 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 V+Use/Circ:V 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 VI+Use/Circ:VI 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 VII+Use/Circ:VII 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 VIII+Use/Circ:VIII 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 IX+Use/Circ:IX 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ; !

LEXICON ROMNUMTAG   !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Nom+Use/Circ:%> # ; !
 +Num+Gen+Use/Circ:%> # ; !
 +Num+Acc+Use/Circ:%> # ; !
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ:%.%> # ; ! !III. as ordinal.
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ:%> # ; ! !Looking for trouble...
 +Num+Use/Circ:%: ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !
 +Num+Use/Circ+Err/Orth:'7 ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !
 +Num+Use/Circ+Err/Orth:%- ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !
 +Num+Use/Circ+Err/Orth:%´ ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !
! +Num: ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !

LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
 +Gen+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>a # ; !  But here 123a 123
 +Acc+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>a # ; ! 
 +Ill+Use/Circ:%>i # ; !
 +Ill+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>ij # ; !
 +Ill+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:%>áj # ; !
 +Loc+Use/Circ:%>s # ; !
 +Com+Use/Circ:%>in # ; !
 +Ess+Use/Circ:%>n # ; !


! A final section with some isolated numeral expresssions !
! ------------------------------------------------------- !

LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP   !!= * __@CODE@__ some isolated numeral expressions
 ½+Num:½ # ;
 ¹+Num:¹ # ;
 ²+Num:² # ;
 ³+Num:³ # ;
 ¼+Num:¼ # ;
 ¾+Num:¾ # ;
 okta+Num+Sg+Nom:okt # ; ! Okt mánná
